Nevada, session 83, AB38.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 489.021 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.021 1. The Legislature finds that the construction,
assembly and use of manufactured homes, mobile homes, [travel
trailers,] manufactured buildings, commercial coaches and factory-
built housing and their systems, components and appliances, and the
alteration, transportation and installation of manufactured homes,
mobile homes, manufactured buildings, commercial coaches and
factory-built housing, like other products having concealed vital
parts, may present hazards to the health, life and safety of persons
and the safety of property unless they are properly manufactured,
altered, transported and installed.
2. In the sale of manufactured homes, mobile homes, [travel
trailers,] manufactured buildings, commercial coaches and factory-
built housing, there is also the possibility of unascertained defects in
them even though they are inspected by purchasers.
3. It is the policy and purpose of this State to protect the public
against these hazards and to prohibit the manufacture, sale,
distribution, alteration, transportation and installation in this State of
manufactured homes, mobile homes, [travel trailers,] manufactured
buildings, commercial coaches and factory-built housing which are
not constructed in a manner which provides reasonable safety and
protection to owners and users.
4. The Legislature further intends to provide a procedure to
ensure that this State assumes the fullest responsibility for the
administration and enforcement of federal safety and construction
standards for manufactured homes in Nevada in accordance with the
National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards
Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. §§ 5401 et seq.
Sec. 1.1. NRS 489.115 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.115 “Manufacturer” means every person, including,
without limitation, a partnership, limited partnership, limited-
liability partnership, limited-liability limited partnership or limited-
liability company, or a corporation, engaged in the business of
manufacturing manufactured homes, mobile homes, [travel trailers,]
manufactured buildings, commercial coaches or factory-built
housing.
Sec. 1.2. NRS 489.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.120 1. “Mobile home” means a structure which is:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
(a) Built on a permanent chassis;
(b) Designed to be used with or without a permanent foundation
as a dwelling when connected to utilities; and
(c) Transportable in one or more sections.
2. The term includes the design of the body and frame and the
plumbing, heating, air-conditioning and electrical systems of the
mobile home.
3. The term does not include a recreational park trailer, [travel
trailer,] commercial coach or manufactured home or any structure
built in compliance with the requirements of chapter 461 of NRS.
Sec. 1.3. NRS 489.122 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.122 “Movement” means the act of towing, pushing or
otherwise propelling a manufactured home, mobile home ,
manufactured building or commercial coach upon a highway or
road.
Sec. 1.4. NRS 489.125 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.125 “New manufactured home,” “new mobile home,”
[“new travel trailer,”] “new manufactured building,” “new
commercial coach” or “new factory-built housing” means a
manufactured home, mobile home, [travel trailer,] manufactured
building or commercial coach or factory-built housing, respectively,
which has never been sold at retail or occupied either before or after
sale for the purpose intended by the manufacturer and has never
been registered with or been the subject of a certificate of title
issued by the appropriate agency of authority of any other state, the
District of Columbia, any territory or possession of the United
States or any foreign state, province or country.
Sec. 1.5. NRS 489.155 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.155 “Used manufactured home,” “used mobile home,”
[“used travel trailer,”] “used manufactured building,” “used
commercial coach” or “used factory-built housing” means a
manufactured home, mobile home, [travel trailer,] manufactured
building or commercial coach or factory-built housing, respectively,
which has been:
1. Sold, rented or leased and occupied before or after the sale,
rental or lease; or
2. Registered with or been the subject of a certificate of title
issued by the appropriate agency of authority of any other state, the
District of Columbia, or any territory or possession of the United
States or any foreign state, province or country.
Sec. 1.6. NRS 489.221 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.221 An employee of the Division shall not hold an interest
in any firm which sells, distributes, manufactures, rebuilds or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
services any manufactured home, mobile home, [travel trailer,]
manufactured building, commercial coach or factory-built housing
or which installs any manufactured home, mobile home,
manufactured building, commercial coach or factory-built housing,
or act as an agent for any of them.
Sec. 1.7. NRS 489.231 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.231 1. To carry out the provisions of this chapter, the
Administrator may:
(a) Issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses or the
production of books, papers and documents; and
(b) Conduct hearings.
2. The Administrator may apply for and receive grants from
the Secretary of Housing and Urban Development for developing
and carrying out a plan for enforcement and administration of
federal standards of safety and construction respecting manufactured
homes offered for sale or lease in this state.
3. The Administrator may adopt regulations to ensure
acceptance by the Secretary of Housing and Urban Development of
the state plan for administration and enforcement of federal
standards of safety and construction respecting manufactured homes
in accordance with the National Manufactured Housing
Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. §§ 5401
et seq.
4. The Administrator may:
(a) Make inspections;
(b) Approve plans and specifications;
(c) Provide technical services;
(d) Issue licenses, permits, certificates of title and certificates
and labels of compliance and installation in such form as he or she
may deem proper, including, without limitation, in electronic form;
(e) Enter into reciprocal agreements with other states or private
organizations that adopt and maintain standards reasonably
consistent with this chapter;
(f) Collect the fees provided for in this chapter; and
(g) Adopt regulations necessary to carry out his or her duties
under this chapter.
5. The Administrator or a representative of the Administrator
may enter, at reasonable times and without notice, any mobile home
park or place of business or any factory, warehouse or establishment
in which manufactured homes, mobile homes, [travel trailers,]
manufactured buildings or factory-built housing are manufactured,
stored or held for sale or distribution and inspect at reasonable times
in a reasonable manner the premises and books, papers, records and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
documents which are relevant to the manufacture, distribution and
sale of manufactured homes, mobile homes, [travel trailers,]
manufactured buildings or factory-built housing and compliance
with the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety
Standards Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. §§ 5401 et seq., this chapter and
chapter 461 of NRS, and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto,
and to compliance by landlords of mobile home parks with the
prohibition in NRS 118B.140 against charging or receiving any
entrance or exit fee. A magistrate shall issue a warrant to permit an
inspection if the Administrator has shown:
(a) Evidence that a violation of a provision of this chapter or of
the prohibition in NRS 118B.140 against charging or receiving any
entrance or exit fee has been committed or is being committed; or
(b) That the business has been chosen for an inspection on the
basis of a general administrative plan for the enforcement of the
provisions of this chapter.
Sec. 2. NRS 489.241 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.241 The Administrator shall adopt regulations:
1. Consistent with the federal regulations governing procedure
and enforcement respecting manufactured homes to administer and
enforce federal construction and safety standards respecting
manufactured homes in accordance with the National Manufactured
Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974 (42 U.S.C.
§§ 5401 et seq.).
2. For the construction of commercial coaches that are
reasonably consistent with nationally recognized standards.
3. For the:
(a) Reconstruction; and
(b) Alteration, including that done to a plumbing, heating or
electrical system,
 of mobile homes and commercial coaches that are reasonably
consistent with nationally recognized standards.
4. For the issuance of certificates and labels of compliance.
The regulations must provide for, without limitation:
(a) Inspection at the place of manufacture;
(b) Submission and approval of plans and specifications or for
the actual inspection and approval of the manufactured home,
mobile home, [travel trailer] manufactured building or commercial
coach or acceptance of a label of compliance issued by another state
or a private organization which the Administrator finds has a
competent inspection program reasonably consistent with this
chapter; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
(c) Revocation for cause, upon notice and hearing, of the right of
a manufacturer to sell manufactured homes, mobile homes, [travel
trailers] manufactured buildings or commercial coaches in this
state for use in this state.
[5. Consistent with nationally recognized standards governing
the minimum requirements for the design of travel trailers.]
Sec. 3. NRS 489.272 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.272 The Administrator shall adopt regulations:
1. Requiring a person who is buying or selling a manufactured
home, mobile home , manufactured building or commercial coach
pursuant to:
(a) A sale to satisfy a lien; or
(b) A contract for sale or other agreement by which the
certificate of title does not pass immediately from the seller to the
buyer upon the sale,
 to submit to the Administrator such information regarding the
sale as the Administrator deems necessary.
2. Establishing requirements for the issuance or transfer of a
certificate of title of a mobile home, manufactured home ,
manufactured building or commercial coach in cases involving:
(a) More than one transferor or transferee;
(b) A transferor or transferee who holds a certificate of title in
trust for another person; or
(c) A sale to satisfy a lien.
Sec. 4. NRS 489.291 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.291 1. If the Administrator finds a violation of this
chapter or of the prohibition in NRS 118B.140 against charging or
receiving an entrance or exit fee, or of any regulation adopted
pursuant to this chapter, the Administrator may issue a notice of
violation to the person alleged to have violated the provision. The
notice of violation must set forth the violation which the
Administrator alleges with particularity and specify the corrective
action which is to be taken and the time within which the action
must be taken. If the person is alleged to have violated the
prohibition in NRS 118B.140 against charging or receiving an
entrance or exit fee, the notice of violation must specify that the fee
be repaid in full, and may specify any other corrective action which
the Administrator deems necessary.
2. Any person who fails to take the corrective action required
in a notice of violation is guilty of a misdemeanor and the
Administrator may:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
(a) Apply to the district court for the judicial district in which
the violation is alleged to have occurred for an injunction and any
other relief which the court may grant to compel compliance;
(b) Request that the district attorney of the county in which the
violation is alleged to have occurred prosecute the person for the
violation;
(c) If the person is alleged to have violated the prohibition in
NRS 118B.140 against charging or receiving an entrance or exit fee,
assess a penalty against the person equal to three times the amount
of the fee which was charged or received; or
(d) If the person is alleged to have violated NRS 489.311 and
while acting without a license is alleged to have caused damage to a
mobile home, manufactured home , manufactured building or
commercial coach, require that the person reimburse the owner of
the mobile home, manufactured home , manufactured building or
commercial coach for the cost of repairing such damage and assess a
penalty against that person equal to the estimated cost of such
repairs.
3. The assessment of a penalty pursuant to paragraph (c) or (d)
of subsection 2 is a contested case.
4. Any person who is found to have violated a provision of this
chapter, the prohibition in NRS 118B.140 against charging or
receiving an entrance or exit fee, or a regulation adopted pursuant to
this chapter, is liable for the cost incurred by the Division in
enforcing the provision or regulation.
Sec. 5. NRS 489.295 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.295 1. If an inspection reveals that a used manufactured
home, used mobile home , used manufactured building or used
commercial coach is constructed or maintained in violation of this
chapter, the Division may order its use discontinued and the used
manufactured home, used mobile home , used manufactured
building or used commercial coach, or any portion thereof, vacated.
2. The order to vacate must be served upon the person using
the used manufactured home, used mobile home , used
manufactured building or used commercial coach and copies of the
order must also be posted at or upon each exit of the used
manufactured home, used mobile home , used manufactured
building or used commercial coach.
3. The order to vacate must include a reasonable time within
which the violation may be corrected.
4. A person shall not occupy or use the used manufactured
home, used mobile home , used manufactured building or used
commercial coach in violation of the order to vacate.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
Sec. 6. NRS 489.297 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.297 1. Whenever any construction, rebuilding or other
work is performed in violation of this chapter or any regulation
adopted pursuant to this chapter, the Division may order the work
stopped.
2. The order to stop work must be served upon the person
doing the work or upon the person causing the work to be done. The
person served with the order shall immediately cease the work until
authorized by the Division to continue it.
3. A copy of the order to stop work must be posted at or upon a
recognized entrance of the used manufactured home, used mobile
home , used manufactured building or used commercial coach.
Sec. 7. NRS 489.325 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.325 1. The Administrator may adopt regulations which
provide for the licensing of specialty servicepersons. A person
licensed as a specialty serviceperson pursuant to this section must be
limited in the scope of the work he or she may perform to
installation or repair in one of the following categories:
(a) Awnings, roofing or skirting;
(b) Plumbing;
(c) Heating and air-conditioning systems;
(d) Electrical systems; or
(e) Any other category that may be similarly licensed by the
State Contractors’ Board.
2. The Administrator shall provide in those regulations for:
(a) The imposition of reasonable fees for application,
examination and licensure.
(b) The creation and administration of a written or oral
examination for each category of limited licensure.
(c) Minimum qualifications for such a license, including,
without limitation, the passage of any applicable examination
required pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 489.351, unless waived
pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 489.351.
3. A person who is licensed as a specialty serviceperson shall
comply with each statute and regulation which applies to general
servicepersons, including, without limitation, the payment of a fee
required pursuant to subparagraph (1) of paragraph (c) of subsection
[2] 1 of NRS 489.4971.
Sec. 8. NRS 489.426 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.426 1. A person who charges or collects an advance fee
shall, within 3 months after charging or collecting such a fee,
furnish to his or her principal an accounting of the use of the money.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
The Administrator also may require an accounting by the person of
the use of the money.
2. A person shall not accept an advance fee listing unless the
person is a dealer, responsible managing employee or salesperson
who is licensed pursuant to this chapter.
3. The Administrator may adopt regulations concerning
advance fee listings and the charging and collecting of an advance
fee, including, but not limited to:
(a) Forms to be used for advance fee agreements; and
(b) Reports and forms of accounting required to be kept, made
or submitted to the Division.
4. A violation of this section or the regulations adopted
pursuant to this section constitutes grounds for disciplinary action
against a licensee.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Advance fee” means the money contracted for, charged,
claimed, collected, demanded or received for an advance fee listing
of, an advertisement for or an offer to sell a manufactured home,
mobile home , manufactured building or commercial coach [,] or
factory-built housing, if the advance fee listing, advertisement or
offer is issued to promote the sale of a manufactured home, mobile
home , manufactured building or commercial coach or factory-
built housing or for referral to a business, to dealers or to
salespersons, before the last printing or other last issuance thereof,
other than by a newspaper of general circulation.
(b) “Advance fee listing” includes, but is not limited to:
(1) The name or a list of the names of owners, prospective
buyers or exchangers, or the location of a manufactured home,
mobile home , manufactured building or commercial coach or
factory-built housing that is offered for sale or exchange.
(2) The location at which prospective or potential buyers or
exchangers of manufactured homes, mobile homes [or] ,
manufactured buildings, commercial coaches or factory-built
housing may be communicated with or found.
(3) An agreement by which a person who is engaged in the
business of promoting the sale of manufactured homes, mobile
homes [or] , manufactured buildings, commercial coaches or
factory-built housing agrees to render to an owner or buyer any
service to promote the sale of the manufactured home, mobile home
[or] , manufactured building, commercial coach or factory-built
housing for an advance fee.
(4) An agreement by which a person agrees to locate or to
promote the sale of a manufactured home, mobile home ,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
manufactured building or commercial coach or factory-built
housing for an advance fee.
 The term does not include any publication issued for general
circulation.
Sec. 8.5. NRS 489.431 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.431 1. The Administrator may on his or her own motion,
and shall upon receiving a complaint, investigate the actions of any
licensee or any other person who assumes to act in the capacity of a
licensee in this State. A complaint must be verified and filed with
the Division within 2 years after the act complained of.
2. If the Administrator finds that the licensee or other person
has acted in violation of this chapter, and that the violation is not
repeated or continuing, the Administrator may attempt to secure a
correction of the violation or satisfaction for the complainant from
the licensee or other person. If the Administrator’s attempt fails or
if the Administrator determines that disciplinary action is necessary,
the Administrator may take disciplinary action.
3. If the Administrator finds that the violation is being
repeatedly or continuously committed, or if in the Administrator’s
discretion the violation warrants disciplinary action, the
Administrator may take disciplinary action without seeking
correction or satisfaction.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this section and NRS
239.0115, a complaint filed with the Division, all documents and
other information filed with the complaint and all documents and
other information compiled as a result of an investigation
conducted to determine whether to initiate disciplinary action
against a licensee or other person who assumes to act in the
capacity of a licensee are confidential.
5. The charging documents filed with the Administrator to
initiate disciplinary action pursuant to this chapter and all
documents and information considered by the Administrator or a
hearing officer when determining whether to impose discipline are
public records.
6. An order that imposes discipline and the findings of fact
and conclusions of law supporting that order are public records.
7. The Administrator shall, to the extent feasible,
communicate or cooperate with or provide any documents or other
information to any other licensing board or any other agency that
is investigating a person, including, without limitation, a law
enforcement agency.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
Sec. 9. NRS 489.461 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.461 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 278.02095, a
manufactured home, mobile home [, travel trailer] or commercial
coach for which a certificate and label of compliance has been
issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter is not required to
comply with any local building codes or ordinances prescribing
standards for plumbing, heating, electrical systems, body and frame
design and construction requirements.
Sec. 10. NRS 489.4971 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.4971 1. [Any person who entered into an agreement for
the sale, purchase, lease, distribution, alteration, repair, remodeling
or manufacture of a manufactured home, mobile home,
manufactured building or commercial coach or factory-built housing
may file a claim against a person licensed pursuant to the provisions
of this chapter. Such a claim may be satisfied by the Account.
2.] Upon the issuance or renewal of the following licenses by
the Division, the licensee must pay, in addition to the original or
renewal license fee, a fee:
(a) For a dealer’s, distributor’s or manufacturer’s original
license, or for any original limited dealer’s license which authorizes
a limited dealer to act as a repossessor or liquidator, of $1,000.
(b) For a dealer’s, distributor’s or manufacturer’s renewal
license, or a renewal of any limited dealer’s license which
authorizes a limited dealer to act as a repossessor or liquidator, of
$600.
(c) For an original or renewal license for:
(1) A general serviceperson or specialty serviceperson, of
$150.
(2) A salesperson, of $75.
(3) A responsible managing employee, of $100.
 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 489.265, fees collected
pursuant to this section must be deposited in the State Treasury for
credit to the Account.
[3. A payment from the Account to satisfy the claim of a
person specified in subsection 1 against a person who is licensed
pursuant to this chapter must be made only upon an appropriate
court order that is issued in an action for fraud, misrepresentation or
deceit relating to an act for which a license is required pursuant to
this chapter.
4. If a person specified in subsection 1 commences an action
specified in subsection 3 against a person who is licensed pursuant
to this chapter, the person specified in subsection 1 must serve a
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
copy of the complaint upon the Administrator within 30 days after
the action is commenced.]
2. Money in the Account must, within the limitations set by
NRS 489.4975 and 489.4983, be used to pay a claim for which:
(a) A court entered an order directing payment of the claim
from the Account pursuant to NRS 489.4979; or
(b) The Administrator compromised the claim pursuant to
NRS 489.4977.
Sec. 11. NRS 489.4975 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.4975 1. If a [purchaser] person who entered into an
agreement for the sale, purchase, lease, distribution, alteration,
repair, remodeling or manufacture of a manufactured home,
mobile home, manufactured building or commercial coach or
factory-built housing commences an action against a person who is
licensed pursuant to this chapter relating to an act or omission of
the licensee that is in violation of this chapter or the regulations
adopted pursuant thereto, the person who commenced the action
must serve a copy of the complaint in the action upon the
Administrator within 30 days after the action is commenced.
2. If the person who commenced the action obtains a final
judgment in any court of competent jurisdiction for the recovery of
damages against [any] the licensee , [under this chapter in an action
specified in subsection 3 of NRS 489.4971,] the judgment creditor
may, [upon] within 1 year after the termination of all proceedings,
including appeals in connection with any judgment, [file] make a
claim for payment from the Account by filing a verified petition in
the court in which the judgment was entered for an order directing
payment from the Account in the amount of actual damages
included in the judgment and unpaid, but not more than $25,000 per
judgment and the liability of the Account may not exceed $100,000
for any licensee.
[2.] 3. A copy of the petition must be served upon the
Administrator and an affidavit of service filed with the court. The
petition and each copy of the petition served pursuant to this
subsection must set forth the grounds which entitle the judgment
creditor to recover from the Account and must include a copy of:
(a) The final judgment specified in subsection [1;] 2;
(b) The complaint upon which the final judgment was entered;
and
(c) If assets are known to exist, the writ of execution that was
returned unsatisfied.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
[3.] 4. The court shall act upon the petition within 30 days
after service and, upon the hearing of the petition, the judgment
creditor must show that:
(a) The judgment creditor is not the spouse of the judgment
debtor, or the personal representative of that spouse.
(b) The judgment creditor has complied with all the
requirements of NRS 489.4971 to 489.4989, inclusive.
(c) The judgment creditor has obtained a judgment of the kind
described in subsection [1,] 2, stating the amount of the judgment
and the amount owing on it at the date of the petition.
(d) A writ of execution has been issued upon the judgment and
that no assets of the judgment debtor liable to be levied upon in
satisfaction of the judgment could be found, or that the amount
realized on the sale of any of them that were found under the
execution was insufficient to satisfy the judgment, stating the
amount so realized and the balance remaining due.
(e) The judgment creditor and the Division have made
reasonable searches and inquiries to ascertain whether the judgment
debtor possesses real or personal property or other assets, liable to
be sold or applied in satisfaction of the judgment.
(f) The petition has been filed not more than 1 year after the
termination of all proceedings, including reviews and appeals, in
connection with the judgment.
[4.] 5. A person licensed pursuant to this chapter shall not
recover from the Account for damages related to a transaction in
which the person acted in his or her capacity as a licensee.
Sec. 12. NRS 489.501 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.501 1. When a new manufactured home, new mobile
home, new manufactured building or new commercial coach or new
factory-built housing is sold in this State by a dealer, the dealer shall
complete a report of sale. The report of sale must be in a form
prescribed by the Division.
2. The dealer shall require the buyer to sign an
acknowledgment of taxes, on a form prescribed by the Division. A
dealer who sells a new manufactured home, new mobile home, new
manufactured building or new commercial coach or new factory-
built housing shall deliver the buyer’s copy of the acknowledgment
of taxes to the buyer at the time of sale and submit another copy
within 30 days after the date of the sale to the county assessor of the
county in which the manufactured home, mobile home,
manufactured building, commercial coach or factory-built housing
will be located.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
3. The dealer shall submit the completed report of sale and the
manufacturer’s certificate or statement of origin to the Division
within 30 days after the execution of all instruments which the
contract of sale required to be executed at the time of sale or within
30 days after the date of sale, whichever is later, unless an extension
of time is granted by the Division.
4. A dealer who sells a new manufactured home, new mobile
home, new manufactured building or new commercial coach or new
factory-built housing shall deliver a copy of the report of sale to the
buyer at the time of sale and submit another copy within 30 days
after the date of the sale to the county assessor of the county in
which the manufactured home, mobile home, manufactured
building, commercial coach or factory-built housing will be located.
Sec. 13. NRS 489.511 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.511 1. If a used or rebuilt manufactured home, mobile
home, manufactured building or commercial coach or used or
rebuilt factory-built housing is sold in this State by a dealer, the
dealer shall complete a dealer’s report of sale. The report must be in
a form prescribed by the Division.
2. The dealer shall submit the completed dealer’s report of sale
to the Division within 45 days after the execution of all instruments
which the contract of sale requires to be executed at the time of the
sale, unless an extension of time is granted by the Division, together
with the endorsed certificate of title previously issued. The dealer
shall furnish one copy of the report of sale to the buyer at the time of
the sale. Within 45 days after the sale, the dealer shall furnish one
copy of the report of sale to the assessor of the county in which the
manufactured home, mobile home, manufactured building,
commercial coach or factory-built housing will be located.
3. The dealer shall require the buyer to sign an
acknowledgment of taxes, on a form prescribed by the Division. The
dealer shall deliver the buyer’s copy of the acknowledgment to the
buyer at the time of sale and submit another copy to the county
assessor of the county in which the manufactured home, mobile
home, manufactured building, commercial coach or factory-built
housing is to be located.
4. If a used or rebuilt manufactured home, mobile home,
manufactured building or commercial coach or used or rebuilt
factory-built housing is sold by a dealer pursuant to an installment
contract or other agreement by which the certificate of title does not
pass immediately from the seller to the buyer upon the sale, the
dealer shall submit to the Division any information required by the
regulations adopted by the Administrator pursuant to NRS 489.272.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
Sec. 14. NRS 489.531 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.531 The Division shall not issue a certificate of title of a
used manufactured home , [or] used mobile home , used
manufactured building or used commercial coach unless the
county assessor of the county in which the manufactured home , [or]
mobile home , manufactured building or commercial coach was
situated at the time of sale has provided to the Division, on a form
prescribed by the Division, verification that all personal property
taxes on that manufactured home , [or] mobile home ,
manufactured building or commercial coach for the fiscal year
have been paid.
Sec. 15. NRS 489.561 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.561 Whenever an application is made to the Division for
title of a manufactured home, mobile home , manufactured
building or commercial coach previously titled and the applicant is
unable to present the certificate of title previously issued because it
is lost or being unlawfully detained by one in possession or is not
otherwise available, the Division may receive the application and
examine the circumstances of the case and require the filing of
affidavits or other information. When the Division is satisfied that
the applicant is entitled to a certificate of title, or pursuant to NRS
489.562, it may issue the certificate on the manufactured home,
mobile home , manufactured building or commercial coach.
Sec. 16. NRS 489.564 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.564 1. The owner or joint owners of a manufactured
home, mobile home , manufactured building or commercial coach
may request the Division to issue a certificate of title in beneficiary
form for the manufactured home, mobile home , manufactured
building or commercial coach, as applicable, which includes a
directive to the Division to transfer the certificate of title upon the
death of the owner or upon the death of all joint owners to a
beneficiary named on the face of the certificate of title.
2. A request made pursuant to subsection 1 must be submitted
on an application made available by the Division and must:
(a) Contain a notarized signature of the owner or each joint
owner; and
(b) Be accompanied by the fee for the issuance of a certificate of
title.
3. A certificate of title in beneficiary form may not be issued to
a person who holds an interest in a manufactured home, mobile
home , manufactured building or commercial coach as a tenant in
common with another person.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 18 –
4. A certificate of title in beneficiary form must include after
the name of the owner or after the names of joint owners the words
“transfer on death to” or the abbreviation “TOD” followed by the
name of the beneficiary.
5. During the lifetime of a sole owner or before the death of the
last surviving joint owner:
(a) The signature or consent of the beneficiary is not required for
any transaction relating to a manufactured home, mobile home ,
manufactured building or commercial coach for which a certificate
of title in beneficiary form has been issued; and
(b) The certificate of title in beneficiary form may be revoked or
the beneficiary changed at any time by:
(1) Sale of the manufactured home, mobile home ,
manufactured building or commercial coach with proper
assignment and delivery of the certificate of title to another person;
or
(2) Filing an application with, and paying a fee to, the
Division to reissue the certificate of title with no designation of a
beneficiary or with the designation of a different beneficiary.
6. The interest of the beneficiary in a manufactured home,
mobile home , manufactured building or commercial coach on the
death of the sole owner or on the death of the last surviving joint
owner is subject to any contract of sale, assignment or ownership or
security interest to which the owner or owners of the manufactured
home, mobile home , manufactured building or commercial coach
were subject during their lifetime.
7. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of subsection
5, the designation of a beneficiary in a certificate of title in
beneficiary form may not be changed or revoked by will, any other
instrument or a change in circumstances, or otherwise changed or
revoked.
8. The Division shall, upon:
(a) Proof of death of one of the owners, of two or more joint
owners or of a sole owner; and
(b) Payment of the fee for a certificate of title,
 issue a new certificate of title for the manufactured home, mobile
home , manufactured building or commercial coach to the
surviving owner or owners or, if none, to the beneficiary, subject to
any security interest.
9. For the purposes of complying with the provisions of
subsection 8, the Division may rely on a death certificate, record or
report that constitutes prima facie evidence of death.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 19 –
10. The transfer on death of a manufactured home, mobile
home , manufactured building or commercial coach pursuant to
this section is not considered as testamentary and is not subject to
administration pursuant to the provisions of title 12 of NRS.
11. As used in this section:
(a) “Beneficiary” means a person or persons designated to
become the owner or owners of a manufactured home, mobile home
, manufactured building or commercial coach on the death of the
preceding owner or owners.
(b) “Certificate of title in beneficiary form” means a certificate
of title of a manufactured home, mobile home , manufactured
building or commercial coach that indicates the present owner or
owners of the manufactured home, mobile home , manufactured
building or commercial coach and designates a beneficiary.
Sec. 17. NRS 489.571 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.571 1. Whenever a security interest is created in a
manufactured home, mobile home , manufactured building or
commercial coach, the certificate of title must be delivered to the
Division with a statement signed by the debtor showing the date of
the security agreement, the names and addresses of the debtor and
the secured party.
2. The Division shall issue to the secured party a certificate of
title with the name and address of the secured party and the name
and address of the registered owner noted on it. If the security
interest is subsequently acquired by another person, or if there is a
change in the name or address of the secured party, the secured
party shall apply to the Division for a corrected certificate of title.
3. When the contract or terms of the security agreement have
been fully performed, the seller or other secured party who holds the
certificate of title shall deliver the certificate to the person legally
entitled to it with proper evidence of the termination or release of
the security interest.
Sec. 18. NRS 489.581 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.581 Compliance with the provisions of this chapter
relating to a security interest in a manufactured home, mobile home
, manufactured building or commercial coach is sufficient for the
perfection and release of that security interest. In all other respects
the rights and duties of the debtor and secured party are governed by
the Uniform Commercial Code—Secured Transactions and chapter
97 of NRS to the extent applicable.
Sec. 19. NRS 489.591 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.591 The Division shall adopt regulations concerning the
issuance of:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 20 –
1. Certificates of installation issued by the Division which
certify that the manufactured home, mobile home , manufactured
building or commercial coach was installed in compliance with
regulations adopted by the Division.
2. Labels of installation issued by the Division which must be
attached to a manufactured home, mobile home , manufactured
building or commercial coach after the certificate of installation has
been issued and removed when the manufactured home, mobile
home , manufactured building or commercial coach is moved from
the location it occupied when the certificate was issued.
Sec. 20. NRS 489.593 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.593 Each certificate of installation issued by the Division
for a manufactured home , [or] mobile home , manufactured
building or commercial coach must include the following
information:
1. The name of the Administrator;
2. The address and telephone number of each office of the
Division;
3. The legal rights of owners of manufactured homes , [and]
mobile homes [;] , manufactured buildings and commercial
coaches;
4. The procedure for filing a complaint with the Administrator;
5. The procedure for resolution of disputes between owners of
manufactured homes , [or] mobile homes , manufactured buildings
or commercial coaches and persons licensed by the Division; and
6. Any other information prescribed by the Administrator.
Sec. 21. NRS 489.595 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.595 A dealer shall provide a copy of the certificate of
installation described in NRS 489.593 to each purchaser of a new
manufactured home [.] , new mobile home, new manufactured
building or new commercial coach. The Division shall make
available sample copies of certificates of installation to all licensed
dealers for distribution to prospective purchasers.
Sec. 22. NRS 489.596 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.596 1. The Division, in cooperation with manufacturers
and organizations concerned with manufactured homes , [and]
mobile homes, manufactured buildings and commercial coaches,
shall conduct one or more training programs each year regarding
appropriate methods and techniques for conducting any inspections
necessary for the issuance of certificates of installation and labels of
installation for manufactured homes , [and] mobile homes [.]
manufactured buildings and commercial coaches.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 21 –
2. The Division shall pay for the expenses of conducting the
programs from money in the Account.
Sec. 23. NRS 489.5965 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.5965 No person may issue a certificate of installation or
label of installation for a manufactured home , [or] mobile home ,
manufactured building or commercial coach unless the person has
successfully completed, within the preceding 12 months, a training
program conducted pursuant to NRS 489.596.
Sec. 24. NRS 489.611 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.611 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, no
manufactured home, mobile home , manufactured building or
commercial coach may be moved upon the highways or roads of this
state through use of any valid license plate unless a proper trip
permit is obtained and displayed.
2. NRS 489.621 to 489.661, inclusive, do not apply to
manufactured homes, mobile homes , manufactured buildings or
commercial coaches moved:
(a) Through this state from and to points outside Nevada.
(b) Into this state with a valid license plate or permit from
another state.
(c) With any valid license plate when movement is from:
(1) The place of manufacture of the manufactured home,
mobile home , manufactured building or commercial coach to the
place of business of a dealer licensed under this chapter;
(2) One dealer lot to another; or
(3) A dealer lot to the place of delivery to that dealer’s buyer.
Sec. 25. NRS 489.621 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.621 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 489.611,
any person who moves a manufactured home, mobile home ,
manufactured building or commercial coach upon any highway or
road in this state shall, before that movement, apply to the county
assessor for a trip permit. The assessor of the county from which the
manufactured home, mobile home , manufactured building or
commercial coach is to be moved shall issue a trip permit for each
section of the manufactured home, mobile home , manufactured
building or commercial coach upon application presented in the
form prescribed by the Division, payment of a fee of $5 for each
permit, and proof satisfactory to the assessor of ownership and that
all property taxes, for the full year in which the permit is to be used,
and use taxes if applicable, levied against the manufactured home,
mobile home , manufactured building or commercial coach and its
contents have been paid.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 22 –
2. The trip permit authorizes movement over the highways and
roads for not more than 5 consecutive working days following the
date of issuance and the application and permit respectively must be
used in lieu only of any certificate of registration and vehicle license
number plate required by law.
Sec. 26. NRS 489.631 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.631 1. The application for a trip permit must contain any
information required by the Division, and the name of the owner of
the manufactured home, mobile home , manufactured building or
commercial coach, the make, model and serial number of the
manufactured home, mobile home , manufactured building or
commercial coach, the location of the place from which it was
moved, the address of the place to which it is to be moved, the
amount of all property taxes paid for the manufactured home,
mobile home , manufactured building or commercial coach for the
year in which the permit will be used, the expiration date of
the permit and the signature of the county assessor or designee of
the county assessor.
2. The county assessor shall, within 10 days after issuing the
trip permit, forward a copy of the application:
(a) To the Division; and
(b) To the assessor of the county where the manufactured home,
mobile home , manufactured building or commercial coach will be
located, unless the manufactured home, mobile home ,
manufactured building or commercial coach is to leave this state.
3. The county assessor shall also provide a copy of the
application:
(a) For use by the operator of the vehicle moving the
manufactured home, mobile home , manufactured building or
commercial coach and the operator shall keep a copy of the
application in his or her possession at all times during the
movement.
(b) To the owner of the manufactured home, mobile home ,
manufactured building or commercial coach.
Sec. 27. NRS 489.641 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.641 1. The Division shall determine the size, shape and
form of the trip permit which may be part of a single form also
containing the application for the permit. Each permit must bear the
month and day of expiration in numerals of sufficient size to be
plainly readable from a reasonable distance during daylight.
2. The trip permit must be prominently displayed on the rear of
each section of the manufactured home, mobile home ,
manufactured building or commercial coach in the manner
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 23 –
prescribed by the Division at all times during which the
manufactured home, mobile home , manufactured building or
commercial coach is moved upon any highway or road. The permit
must be made and displayed in a manner that renders the permit
unusable when removed from the manufactured home, mobile home
, manufactured building or commercial coach.
Sec. 28. NRS 489.661 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.661 1. Any person who moves a manufactured home,
mobile home , manufactured building or commercial coach in
violation of the provisions of NRS 489.611 to 489.651, inclusive, is
guilty of a misdemeanor.
2. If a manufactured home, mobile home , manufactured
building or commercial coach is moved upon any highway or road
in the State in violation of any of the provisions of NRS 489.611 to
489.651, inclusive, the Division, any member of the Nevada
Highway Patrol or any peace officer in the State shall seize and hold
the manufactured home, mobile home , manufactured building or
commercial coach until presented with a copy of the application and
trip permit required by NRS 489.621 to 489.661, inclusive.
Sec. 28.5. NRS 489.701 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.701 1. Any mobile home [,] or commercial coach [or
travel trailer] sold or used for residential purposes in this State must
be equipped with a smoke detector which meets standards approved
by the State Fire Marshal.
2. Any manufactured home sold or used for residential
purposes in this State must be equipped with a smoke detector
which meets federal construction and safety standards for
manufactured homes in accordance with the National Manufactured
Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974 (42 U.S.C.
§§ 5401 et seq.).
3. An interconnectivity device for smoke detectors is not
required to be installed in a mobile home or manufactured home that
was not designed and produced by the manufacturer to
accommodate such a device.
Sec. 29. NRS 489.711 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.711 Notwithstanding the provisions of chapters 361 and
482 of NRS or any other law, no dealer may be required to pay any
property tax, either as tax on inventory or on individual
manufactured homes, mobile homes , manufactured buildings or
commercial coaches [,] or factory-built housing, on any
manufactured home, mobile home , manufactured building or
commercial coach or factory-built housing of which the dealer
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 24 –
takes possession and holds for sale in the ordinary course of
business.
Sec. 30. NRS 489.715 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.715 1. Full disclosure of all terms and conditions of an
offer to sell, buy or lease a used or rebuilt manufactured home, used
or rebuilt mobile home , used or rebuilt manufactured building or
used or rebuilt commercial coach or used or rebuilt factory-built
housing must be set forth in writing and signed by the seller, buyer
and dealer.
2. Any offer to purchase or lease a used or rebuilt
manufactured home, used or rebuilt mobile home , used or rebuilt
manufactured building or used or rebuilt commercial coach or
used or rebuilt factory-built housing must be submitted within 5
days after the offer is made to the owner or the authorized agent of
the owner for approval or disapproval. The offer must be in writing
and signed and dated by the person making the offer and by the
dealer.
3. As used in this section, “authorized agent” does not include
a dealer or an employee or agent of the dealer.
Sec. 31. NRS 489.7152 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.7152 The Administrator shall prescribe the form of the
contracts that must be used by a dealer for the sale and listing for
sale of a manufactured home, mobile home , manufactured
building or commercial coach [.] or factory-built housing. A dealer
who fails to use the forms prescribed by the Administrator pursuant
to this section is subject to disciplinary action pursuant to
NRS 489.381.
Sec. 32. NRS 489.7235 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.7235 1. The Division may investigate and audit any
financial account, including, without limitation, any trust account,
related to the business of a dealer or distributor if [:
(a) The] the Division [has reasonable cause to believe that the
dealer or distributor is using or has used the account to carry on the
business of the dealer or distributor; and
(b) The Division:
(1)] :
(a) Has reasonable cause to believe [or has received a credible
complaint] that the dealer or distributor [is insolvent or is in a
financial condition, or has engaged in a financial practice, which
creates a substantial risk of insolvency; or
(2)] has violated a provision of this chapter or the
regulations adopted pursuant thereto; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 25 –
(b) Determines that the investigation and audit are reasonably
necessary to assist the Division in administering or enforcing any
provision of law.
2. The Administrator shall adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section, including, without limitation, prescribing
the scope of an investigation or audit conducted pursuant to this
section.
[3. As used in this section, “insolvency” or “insolvent” means a
condition under which a dealer or distributor is unable to meet the
liabilities of his or her business as they become due in the regular
course of business and which creates a substantial risk of harm to
the public or a consumer.]
Sec. 33. NRS 489.727 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.727 A dealer shall not commingle the money or other
property of a seller or purchaser of a manufactured home , [or a]
mobile home , manufactured building or commercial coach or
factory-built housing with his or her own.
Sec. 34. NRS 489.801 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.801 1. It is unlawful for any person to manufacture any
manufactured home, mobile home, [travel trailer or] manufactured
building, commercial coach or factory-built housing unless the
manufactured home, mobile home, [travel trailer or] manufactured
building, commercial coach or factory-built housing and its
components and systems are constructed and assembled according
to the standards prescribed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
2. It is unlawful for any person knowingly to sell or offer for
sale any manufactured home which has been constructed on or after
June 15, 1976, unless the manufactured home and its components
and systems have been constructed and assembled according to the
standards prescribed pursuant to the National Manufactured
Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974 (42 U.S.C.
§§ 5401 et seq.).
3. Any person who knowingly sells or offers to sell in this state
any manufactured home, mobile home or commercial coach for
which a certificate or label of compliance is required under this
chapter, which does not bear a certificate or label of compliance, is
liable for the penalties provided in NRS 489.811 and 489.821.
4. It is unlawful for any person to issue a certification which
states that a manufactured home conforms to all applicable federal
standards for safety and construction if that person, in the exercise
of due care, has reason to know that the certification is false or
misleading in any material respect.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 26 –
5. It is unlawful for a manufacturer to fail to furnish
notification of defects relating to construction or safety, as required
by the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Act
of 1974 (42 U.S.C. § 5414).
6. It is unlawful for any person to fail or refuse to permit access
by the Administrator to the documentary materials set forth in
NRS 489.231.
7. It is unlawful for any person, without authorization from the
Division, to disclose or obtain the contents of an examination given
by the Division.
8. It is unlawful for any person to use a manufactured home or
mobile home as living quarters or for human occupancy,
respectively, if the manufactured home or mobile home violates a
standard of safety set forth in regulations adopted pursuant to
subsection 1 of NRS 489.251, concerning installation, tie down, and
support of manufactured homes and mobile homes.
Sec. 34.5. NRS 489.811 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.811 1. [Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5,
any] Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter is
liable to the State for a civil penalty of not more than $1,000 for
each violation. Each violation of this chapter or any regulation or
order issued under it constitutes a separate violation with respect to
each manufactured home, mobile home, manufactured building,
commercial coach or factory-built housing and with respect to each
failure or refusal to allow or perform an act required by this chapter
or regulation or order, except that the maximum civil penalty is
$1,000,000 for any related series of violations occurring within 1
year after the first violation.
2. Before the adoption of any regulation for whose violation a
civil penalty may be imposed, the Administrator shall give at least
30 days’ written notice to every licensed manufacturer, dealer,
distributor, general serviceperson and specialty serviceperson, and
every other interested party who has requested the notice.
3. An action to enforce a civil penalty must be brought in a
court of competent jurisdiction in the county in which the defendant
has his or her principal place of business.
4. All money collected as civil penalties pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter must be deposited in the Account.
[5. This section does not apply to a manufacturer, distributor or
dealer of travel trailers.]
Sec. 35. NRS 489.821 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.821 1. A person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor who
knowingly:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 27 –
(a) Makes any false entry on any certificate of origin or
certificate of title.
(b) Furnishes false information to the Division concerning any
security interest.
(c) Files with the Administrator any notice, statement or other
document required under the provisions of this chapter which is
false or contains any material misstatement of fact.
(d) Whether acting individually or as a director, officer or agent
of a corporation, violates a provision of the National Manufactured
Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C.
§§ 5401 et seq., this chapter and chapter 461 of NRS, and any
regulations adopted pursuant thereto, causing a condition which
endangers the health or safety of a purchaser of a manufactured
home.
2. A dealer is guilty of a gross misdemeanor who knowingly:
(a) Fails to maintain a trust account as required by
NRS 489.724.
(b) Commingles the money or other property of a seller or
purchaser of a manufactured home, manufactured building , [or]
mobile home or commercial coach or factory-built housing with his
or her own.
(c) Fails to cooperate or comply with or knowingly impedes or
interferes with any investigation or audit conducted by the Division
pursuant to NRS 489.7235.
(d) Acts as a dealer while insolvent or engages in any financial
practice which creates a substantial risk of insolvency.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this section, any person who
knowingly or willfully violates any provision of this chapter is
guilty of a misdemeanor.
[4. Subsection 3 does not apply to a manufacturer of travel
trailers.]
Sec. 36. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 37. NRS 118B.080 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118B.080 1. The landlord shall disclose in writing to each
tenant the:
(a) Name, address and telephone number of the owner [and
manager] or [assistant manager] representative of the manufactured
home park [;] and the electronic mail address of the manufactured
home park, if available; and
(b) Name , electronic mail address, if available, and address of
a person authorized to receive service of process for the landlord,
 and any change thereof.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 28 –
2. The information must be furnished in writing to each new
tenant on or before the commencement of the tenancy and to each
existing tenant.
3. A landlord shall post [, or] in a conspicuous place in a
common area of the park and provide to each tenant [,] the office
hours [or] , which must be during regular business hours, and the
landlord’s availability at the park location.
4. If the manufactured home park consists of 75 or more lots,
the manager or assistant manager:
(a) Must be available at the park location for at least 8 hours
each week, which must be during regular business hours; and
(b) Shall post the hours of availability of the manager or
assistant manager required pursuant to paragraph (a) in a
conspicuous place in a common area of the park.
Sec. 38. NRS 118B.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118B.120 1. The landlord or his or her agent or employee
may:
(a) [Require] Except as otherwise provided in the rental
agreement or lease or subsection 4, require that the tenant
[landscape and] reasonably maintain the tenant’s lot to control
weeds and any grass or other vegetation if the landlord [advises]
has provided the tenant [in writing of reasonable requirements for
the landscaping.] with 30 days’ advance written notice of this
requirement.
(b) If the tenant does not comply with the provisions of
paragraph (a), maintain the tenant’s lot to control weeds and any
grass or other vegetation and charge the tenant a service fee for the
actual cost of that maintenance.
(c) Require that the manufactured home be removed from the
park if it is unoccupied for more than 90 consecutive days and the
tenant or dealer is not making good faith and diligent efforts to sell
it.
2. The landlord shall maintain, in the manner required for the
other tenants, any lot on which is located a manufactured home
within the park which has been repossessed, abandoned or held for
rent or taxes. The landlord is entitled to reimbursement for the cost
of that maintenance from the repossessor or lienholder or from the
proceeds of any sale for taxes, as the case may be.
3. Before dismantling a manufactured home that was
abandoned, the landlord or manager must:
(a) Conduct a title search with the Division to determine the
owner of record of the manufactured home. If the owner of record is
not found, the landlord or manager may use the records of the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 29 –
county assessor for the county in which the manufactured home is
located to determine the owner of the manufactured home.
(b) Send a certified letter notifying the owner and any lienholder
of the intent of the landlord or manager to dismantle the
manufactured home.
(c) If the owner does not respond within 30 days after the date
of mailing the certified letter, submit to the Division an affidavit of
dismantling.
4. The landlord shall trim all the trees located within the park
and dispose of the trimmings from those trees absent a written
voluntary assumption of that duty by the tenant for trees on the
tenant’s lot.
5. For the purposes of this section, a manufactured home shall
be deemed to be abandoned if:
(a) It is located on a lot in a manufactured home park, other than
a cooperative park, for which no rent has been paid for at least 60
days;
(b) It is unoccupied; and
(c) The manager of the manufactured home park reasonably
believes it to be abandoned.
Sec. 39. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 39.3. NRS 118B.215 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
118B.215 1. In addition to the requirements set forth in NRS
319.510, money in the Account may be used to pay necessary
administrative costs and to assist eligible persons by supplementing
their monthly rent for the manufactured home lot on which their
manufactured home is located. Except as otherwise provided in
subsection 3, to be eligible for assistance from the Account, a person
must:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, have been a
tenant in the same manufactured home park in this State for at least
1 year immediately preceding his or her application for assistance;
(b) Be the registered owner of the manufactured home which is
subject to the tenancy, as indicated on the certificate of title that is
issued by the Division pursuant to NRS 489.541;
(c) Have a monthly household income, as determined by the
Administrator in accordance with subsection 2, which is at or below:
(1) The federally designated level signifying poverty or thirty
percent of the median family income, as prescribed by the HOME
Investment Partnerships Act, 42 U.S.C. §§ 12701 et seq., adjusted
for household size, which the United States Department of Housing
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 30 –
and Urban Development has established for the area of the State in
which the manufactured home is located, whichever is greater; or
(2) A maximum monthly household income that the
Administrator has established by regulation pursuant to
subsection 5;
(d) Be a tenant in a manufactured home park that is operated for
profit and maintain continuous tenancy in that park during the
duration of the supplemental assistance; and
(e) Not have assets whose value is more than $12,000, excluding
the value of:
(1) The manufactured home which is subject to the tenancy;
(2) The contents of that manufactured home; and
(3) One motor vehicle.
 A person who has been a tenant of a manufactured home park in
this State for at least 1 year, but has not been a tenant of the
manufactured home park in which the tenant resides at the time the
tenant applies for assistance for at least 1 year, is eligible for
assistance from the Account if the tenant moved to the
manufactured home park in which the tenant resides at the time of
his or her application because the tenant was unable to pay the rent
at the manufactured home park from which the tenant moved or
because that park was closed.
2. In determining the monthly household income of an
applicant pursuant to subsection 1, the Administrator shall exclude
from the calculation:
(a) The value of any food stamps the applicant received pursuant
to the Food Stamp Act of 1977, as amended, 7 U.S.C. §§ 2011 et
seq., during the year immediately preceding his or her application
for assistance; or
(b) If the applicant is receiving coverage pursuant to Medicare
Part B, 42 U.S.C. §§ 1395j et seq., the value of the cost of that
coverage during the year immediately preceding his or her
application for assistance,
 whichever is greater.
3. The Administrator may waive the requirements for
eligibility set forth in subsection 1 upon the written request of an
applicant if the applicant demonstrates to the satisfaction of the
Administrator that the circumstances of the applicant warrant a
waiver as a result of:
(a) Illness;
(b) Disability; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 31 –
(c) Extreme financial hardship based upon a significant
reduction of income, when considering the applicant’s current
financial circumstances.
 An applicant shall include with his or her request for a waiver all
medical and financial documents that support his or her request.
4. The Administrator shall adopt regulations establishing:
(a) The annual reporting requirements for persons receiving
assistance pursuant to this section. The regulations must require that
each such person provide the Division with a written
acknowledgment of his or her continued eligibility for assistance.
(b) The maximum amount of assistance which may be
distributed to a person to supplement his or her monthly rent
pursuant to this section.
5. The Administrator may adopt regulations establishing a
maximum monthly household income for a person to be eligible for
assistance from the Account pursuant to subparagraph (2) of
paragraph (c) of subsection 1.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Manufactured home” includes a travel trailer that is located
on a manufactured home lot within a manufactured home park.
(b) “Monthly household income” means the combined monthly
incomes of the occupants of a manufactured home which is subject
to the tenancy for which assistance from the Account is requested.
(c) “Travel trailer” [has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS
489.150.] means a portable structure mounted on wheels,
consisting of a vehicular chassis primarily designed as temporary
living quarters for recreational, camping or travel use and
designed to be drawn by another vehicle, and designated by the
manufacturer as a travel trailer. The term does not include a
recreational park trailer.
Sec. 39.7. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 32 –
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 33 –
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 489.431, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031,
561.285, 571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, sections 35, 38 and 41 of chapter 478, Statutes of Nevada
2011 and section 2 of chapter 391, Statutes of Nevada 2013 and
unless otherwise declared by law to be confidential, all public books
and public records of a governmental entity must be open at all
times during office hours to inspection by any person, and may be
fully copied or an abstract or memorandum may be prepared from
those public books and public records. Any such copies, abstracts or
memoranda may be used to supply the general public with copies,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 34 –
abstracts or memoranda of the records or may be used in any other
way to the advantage of the governmental entity or of the general
public. This section does not supersede or in any manner affect the
federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge, diminish or affect in
any other manner the rights of a person in any written book or
record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 35 –
Sec. 40. Chapter 461A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
When a mobile home park is sold or otherwise transferred, the
purchaser or transferee of the mobile home park shall complete
and submit a report of transfer to the Division within 10 business
days after the sale or transfer. The report of transfer must be in a
form prescribed by the Division.
Sec. 40.5. NRS 489.150 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 41. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 40.5, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)